California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) Any person providing the department with a mailing address shall declare, under penalty of perjury, that the mailing address is a valid, existing, and accurate mailing address and shall consent to receive service of process pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 415.20, subdivision (a) of Section 415.30, and Section 416.90 of the Code of Civil Procedure at the mailing address.

(d) (1) Any registration or driver’s license record of a person may be suppressed from any other person, except those persons specified in subdivision (a), if the person requesting the suppression submits either of the following:

(A) A certificate or identification card issued to the person as a program participant by the Secretary of State pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(B) Verification acceptable to the department that he or she has reasonable cause to believe either of the following:

(i) That he or she is the subject of stalking, as specified in Section 1708.7 of the Civil Code or Section 646.9 of the Penal Code.

(ii) That there exists a threat of death or great bodily injury to his or her person, as defined in Section 12022.7 of the Penal Code.

(2) Upon suppression of a record, each request for information about that record shall be authorized by the subject of the record or verified as legitimate by other investigative means by the department before the information is released.

(e) (1) The suppression of a record pursuant to a verification under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall occur for one year after approval by the department. Not less than 60 days prior to the date the suppression of the record would otherwise expire, the department shall notify the subject of the record of its impending expiration. The suppression may be continued for two additional periods of one year each if a letter is submitted to the department stating that the person continues to have a reasonable cause to believe that he or she is the subject of stalking or that there exists a threat of death or great bodily injury as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d). The suppression may be additionally continued at the end of the second one-year period by submitting verification acceptable to the department. The notification described in this subdivision shall instruct the person of the method to reapply for record suppression.

(2) The suppression of a record made in accordance with the submission of a certificate or identification card under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall occur for four years following the submission of the certificate or identification card described in this paragraph. The suppression may be continued for an additional four-year period, and for subsequent four-year periods, upon the submission of a current certificate or identification card described in this paragraph.

(f) For the purposes of subdivisions (d) and (e), “verification acceptable to the department” means recent police reports, court documentation, or other documentation from a law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.22.

(a) Section 1808.21 does not apply to a financial institution licensed by the state or federal government to do business in the State of California, if the financial institution states under penalty of perjury that it has obtained a written waiver of Section 1808.21 signed by the individual whose address is requested, or to providing the address of a person who has entered into an agreement held by that institution prior to July 1, 1990, so long as that agreement remains in effect.

(b) (1) Section 1808.21 does not apply to an insurance company licensed to do business in California, or to an authorized contractor acting on behalf of that insurance company,
 pursuant to a contractual agreement, if the company or contractor, under penalty of perjury, requests the information for the purpose of obtaining the address of another motorist or vehicle owner involved in an accident with the company’s insured.

(2) Section 1808.21 does not apply to an insurance company licensed to do business in California if the company, under penalty of perjury, requests the information on an individual who has signed a written waiver of Section 1808.21 or on the individuals insured under a policy if a named insured of that policy has signed a written waiver.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Vehicle Code and regulations adopted by the department, all information obtained from the department pursuant to the
 exemptions in subdivision (b) shall be subject to the existing use or disclosure limitations and data security requirements for the principal under applicable state and federal law.

(2) Use or disclosure limitations and data security requirements imposed on an authorized contractor by this subdivision shall be enforced by the department in compliance with its existing regulations governing the use or disclosure of information obtained from the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The use or disclosure of information obtained from the department by an authorized contractor of the insurance company pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall be permitted only for the purpose of obtaining the address of another motorist or vehicle owner involved in an accident with the company’s insured. The information shall not be used or disclosed for any other purpose, other than
 the reason for which the information was requested, or to any other person.

(4) An insurance company shall be responsible for any misuse of the information by the authorized contractor.

(5) An authorized contractor is subject to all of the following requirements:

(A) All information obtained by the contractor from the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), and any copies made of that information, shall be destroyed by the contractor pursuant to Section 1798.81 of the Civil Code, once the contractor has used the information for the purpose of obtaining the address of a motorist or vehicle owner involved in an accident with individuals insured with the insurer.

(B) The contractor shall not sell the information obtained from the
 department or store, combine, or link that information with a database for resale or for any purpose other than obtaining the address of a motorist or vehicle owner involved in an accident with individuals insured with the insurer.

(C) The contractor shall maintain a log to track the receipt, use, and dissemination of the information. The log shall be immediately available to the department upon request and maintained for four years from the date of the request.

(D) The contractor shall maintain a surety bond in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 1810.2 and Section 350.24 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(E) A contractor that violates this section shall be liable to the department for civil penalties up to the amount of one hundred thousand
 dollars ($100,000), and, if the contractor is a commercial requester pursuant to Section 1810.2, the contractor shall also have his or her requester code suspended for a period of five years, or revoked, pursuant to Section 1808.46.

(d) Section 1808.21 does not apply to an attorney if the attorney states, under penalty of perjury, that the motor vehicle or vessel registered owner or driver residential address information is necessary in order to represent his or her client in a criminal or civil action that directly involves the use of the motor vehicle or vessel that is pending, is to be filed, or is being investigated. Information requested pursuant to this subdivision is subject to all of the following:

(1) The attorney shall state that the criminal or civil action that is pending, is to be filed, or is being investigated relates directly to the use of that motor vehicle or
 vessel.

(2) The case number, if any, or the names of expected parties to the extent they are known to the attorney requesting the information, shall be listed on the request.

(3) A residence address obtained from the department shall not be used for any purpose other than in furtherance of the case cited or action to be filed or that is being investigated.

(4) If an action is not filed within a reasonable time, the residence address information shall be destroyed.

(5) An attorney shall not request residential address information pursuant to this subdivision in order to sell the information to a person.

(6) Within 10 days of receipt of a request, the department shall notify every individual
 whose residence address has been requested pursuant to this subdivision.

(e) A knowing violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (d) is a misdemeanor. A knowing violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of subdivision (d) in furtherance of another crime is subject to the same penalties as that other crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 353, Sec. 1.   (AB 953)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.23.

(a) Section 1808.21 does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A vehicle manufacturer licensed to do business in this state if the manufacturer, or its agent, under penalty of perjury, requests and uses the information only for the purpose of safety, warranty, including a warranty issued in compliance with Section 1795.92 of the Civil Code, emission, or product recall if the manufacturer offers to make and makes any changes at no cost to the vehicle owner.

(2) A dealer licensed to do business in this state if the dealer, or its agent, under penalty of perjury, requests and uses the information only for the purpose of
 completing registration transactions and documents.

(3) A person who, under penalty of perjury, requests and uses the information as permitted under subdivision (h) of Section 1798.24 of the Civil Code, if the request specifies that no persons will be contacted by mail or otherwise at the address included with the information released. The information released by the department under this subdivision shall not be in a form that identifies any person.

(4) An electrical corporation as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code or a local publicly owned electric utility as defined in Section 224.3 of the Public Utilities Code, if the corporation or utility, or its agent, under penalty of perjury, requests and uses the information only for the purposes of identifying where an electric vehicle is registered. All of the following shall apply to this paragraph:

(A) The department may disclose to the electrical corporation or local publicly owned utility only the type of vehicle and address of the electric vehicle owner. The department shall not disclose the name of the electric vehicle owner.

(B) Within 15 days of receiving residence address information from the department pursuant to this section, an electrical corporation or local publicly owned utility shall provide a clear, express disclosure to the electric vehicle owner that his or her residence address information is permitted by law to be shared with the corporation or utility. The disclosure shall not contain marketing information or a solicitation for the purchase of goods or
 services.

 (C) Confidential home address and type of vehicle information of electric vehicle owners disclosed pursuant to this paragraph shall only be used for the purpose of identifying where an electric vehicle is registered and shall not be used or disclosed for any other purpose, including for purposes of identifying the individual or individuals residing at the address, or to any other person.

(D) The electrical corporation or local publicly owned utility and its agents shall not sell, share, or further disclose, including to any subsidiaries, the residence address or type of vehicle information of electric vehicle owners obtained pursuant to this paragraph, or name information determined by matching residence information against the corporation or utility’s customer
 records.

(b) Residential addresses released shall not be used for direct marketing or solicitation for the purchase of any consumer product or service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   (SB 859)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.24.

Information regarding any motor vehicle liability insurance policy or surety bond provided to the department pursuant to Section 4000.37 or provided electronically is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person, except to the following:

(a) A court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) A law enforcement or other governmental agency.

(c) An insurance company or its assigns to verify a record the company or its assigns previously submitted to the department.

(d) A person whose vehicle or property has been involved in an accident reported to the department, or who suffered bodily injury or death in an accident reported to the department, pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 7, or the person’s authorized representative, employer, parent, or legal guardian.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.25.

(a) The department shall implement a program to provide residence address information to an accredited degree-granting nonprofit independent institution of higher education incorporated in the state, that has concluded a memorandum of understanding pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 830.7 of the Penal Code if, under penalty of perjury, the institution requests and uses the information solely for the purpose of enforcing parking restrictions.

(b) The memorandum of understanding executed by the sheriff or chief of police within whose jurisdiction the independent institution is located shall expressly permit the institution to enforce parking restrictions pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 830.7 of the Penal Code. For the purposes of this subdivision, a participating institution shall enter into a contractual agreement with the department that, at a minimum, requires the institution to do all of the following:

(1) Establish and maintain procedures, to the satisfaction of the department, for persons to contest parking violation notices issued by the institution.

(2) Remit a fee, as determined by the department, to cover the department’s costs of providing each address to the institution.

(3) Agree that access to confidential residence address information from the department’s vehicle registration database will be provided only through an approved commercial requester account.

(4) Establish and maintain a system that ensures that confidential address information obtained from the department is used solely for the purpose specified in subdivision (a).

(c) The director may terminate a contract authorized by subdivision (b) at any time the department determines that the independent institution of higher education fails to maintain adequate safeguards to ensure that the operation of the program does not adversely affect those individuals whose records are maintained in the department’s files, or that the information is used for any purpose other than that specified in subdivision (a).

(d) Sections 1808.45, 1808.46, and 1808.47 are applicable to persons who obtain department records pursuant to this section and the department may pursue any appropriate civil or criminal action against any individual at an independent institution who violates the provisions of this section.

(e) For purposes of this article only, any confidential information obtained from the department for administration or enforcement of this article shall be held confidential, except to the extent necessary for the enforcement of parking restrictions, and may not be used for any purpose other than the administration or enforcement of parking restrictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.3.

(a) The department may participate in the State-to-State Verification Service, or any successor system, operated by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators (AAMVA), for the sole purpose of verifying and exchanging driver’s license, identification card, and driver history records with participating jurisdictions.

(b) (1) Information shared shall be limited to the minimum necessary for the purpose described in subdivision (a) and shall only include the following:

(A) True full name.

(B) Date of birth.

(C) (i) Social security account number.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the minimum pointer information provided to the State-to-State Verification Service shall be the last five digits of the social security account number.

(iii) Consistent with the data limitation requirements set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 1653.5, a social security account number may only be shared for the sole purpose of verifying and exchanging driver’s license, identification card, and driver history records with participating jurisdictions.

(D) State of record.

(E) Driver’s license or identification card number.

(F) Credential type.

(G) REAL ID indicator.

(H) Commercial Driver’s License Information System indicator.

(I) Information necessary to verify and exchange driver history records, including, records of accidents, conviction, and withdrawals, information on driver’s license or permit class, endorsements, restrictions, and card issuance information.

(2) Unless otherwise required by federal law, the department shall not disclose any of the following information through the State-to-State Verification Service:

(A) Address.

(B) Photograph.

(C) Gender marker.

(D) Biometric
 data, including, but not limited to, fingerprints.

(E) Whether the individual holds a driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Section 12801.9.

(3) The department shall make publicly available on its internet website a list of the information shared with participating jurisdictions using the State-to-State Verification Service, including notice that the department will share an applicant’s prior true full names contained in its records.

(c) (1) The department shall prepare an annual report on its participation in the State-to-State Verification Service, or any successor system, annually provide the report to the budget and relevant policy committees of the Legislature, and publish the report on the department’s internet website.

(2) The report shall include all of the following:

(A) Each participating jurisdiction’s number of requests made directly to the state, and, to the extent available, disaggregated by the reason for requests made.

(B) Information on any unusual requests or patterns in the data that indicates a participating jurisdiction is utilizing the State-to-State Verification Service for unauthorized purposes.

(C) Information regarding any known and confirmed breach of contract by other participating jurisdictions, privacy or security breaches, material changes to the AAMVA policies for the State-to-State Verification Service that occur, or any known and confirmed suspension or termination of any state’s State-to-State Verification Service Agreement.

(3) The report shall be provided on or before February 1, 2028, and each February 1 thereafter. The report shall be provided without unreasonable delay, with consideration for operational, technical, or investigative needs, or other sensitive information.

(d) (1) The department shall adopt and maintain a State-to-State Verification Service Monitoring Plan to detect, prevent, and respond to requests for, or uses of, information through the State-to-State Verification Service by a participating jurisdiction for a purpose other than the purpose described in subdivision (a). The plan shall contain information on how the department will perform the following:

(A) Maintain and analyze audit logs of requests sent through or received from the State-to-State Verification Service.

(B) Review and investigate anomalous or irregular requests.

(C) Review of requests from participating jurisdictions based on risk factors or other information that reasonably indicates a potential use of the State-to-State Verification Service for a purpose other than the purpose described in subdivision (a).

(D) Limit, delay, or decline disclosure of information to a participating jurisdiction for anomalous or irregular requests.

(E) Limit, delay, or decline batch, bulk, list-based, pattern-based, automated, or exploratory requests from participating jurisdictions.

(F) Meet reporting requirements as described in subdivision (c).

(2) The department shall consult stakeholders to advise the department on the State-to-State Monitoring Plan. The advisory group shall meet on or before November 1, 2026, and twice annually thereafter, until July 1, 2030. The advisory group shall consist of the following appointees:

(A) A representative of the Department of Justice with knowledge of federal compliance.

(B) Three members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Senate Committee on Rules. These three members shall include an immigration rights advocate, a LGBTQ+ rights advocate, and a cybersecurity expert.

(C) Three members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Speaker. These three members shall include a privacy rights advocate, a reproductive rights
 advocate, and a civil rights expert.

(3) The advisory group shall serve until July 1, 2030, and as of that date shall be disbanded.

(4) The department shall provide the budget and relevant policy committees with a draft version of the plan by February 1, 2027, and a final plan by July 1, 2027.

(e) (1) If the department reasonably determines that a participating jurisdiction has requested or used information for a purpose other than the purpose described in subdivision (a), the department shall refer the matter to the Department of Justice.

(2) (A) If the department determines that a participating jurisdiction has requested or used information maintained in the department’s records and obtained through the
 State-to-State Verification Service for a purpose other than the purpose described in subdivision (a), the department shall notify the AAMVA, the Department of Justice, and each person whose record was the subject of the request or use without unreasonable delay, with consideration for operational, technical, or investigative needs, or other sensitive information, using the notice requirements pursuant to Section 1798.29 of the Civil Code.

(B) The notification shall include, but is not limited to, a description of the information that was disclosed, the time and date of the requests, and, if known, the department’s determination of the reason that a participating jurisdiction requested or used this information.

(f) The Attorney General may commence an action against the AAMVA, a participating jurisdiction, another individual or entity, or on behalf of a California resident whose
 information was the subject of a request unrelated to the sole purposes of the State-to-State Verification Service, to enforce the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, an application or motion for an order enjoining ongoing or subsequent violations of this section. The Attorney General shall not commence an action pursuant to this subdivision unless the Attorney General has reason to believe the AAMVA or a participating jurisdiction intends to obtain or use information for any purpose other than verifying and exchanging driver’s license, identification card, and driver history records, as necessary, to comply with the REAL ID Act of 2005 (Public Law 109-13).

(g) (1) The department shall not participate in the State-to-State Verification Service unless the agreement with the AAMVA is consistent with this section. The department shall not agree to any amendment to the agreement with the AAMVA that
 reduces, conflicts with, delays, or waives, the privacy protections of California residents or the department’s ability to detect, prevent, and respond to requests for information by participating jurisdictions for a purpose other than the purpose described in subdivision (a). The department may only sign an agreement with the AAMVA, if the agreement contains all of the following terms:

(A) Requires the AAMVA to promptly provide notice to the department, if legally permitted, and work in good faith with the department in formulating a response to any requests, in the form of a subpoena or otherwise, from an entity that is not a participating jurisdiction to release, disclose, discuss, or obtain access to State-to-State Verification Service information or records.

(B) Requires participating jurisdictions to retain only the minimum necessary information that is needed for their
 governmental business purposes, and agree to securely destroy the remaining information that participating jurisdiction receives.

(C) Requires the AAMVA and participating jurisdictions to not share, sell, or otherwise make available information disclosed pursuant to this agreement, unless otherwise required by federal law.

(D) (i) The AAMVA shall immediately temporarily suspend a participating jurisdiction’s agreement if it determines that the participating jurisdiction has done either of the following:

(I) Incurred an unauthorized use of the State-to-State Verification Service.

(II) Violated or failed to comply with the terms of its agreement with the AAMVA.

(ii) The
 AAMVA shall also immediately temporarily suspend a participating jurisdiction’s agreement if the suspension is required to protect the integrity of the State-to-State Verification Service.

(E) Participating jurisdictions agree to restrict access to the State-to-State Verification Service to only their authorized state employees, agents, representatives, or contractors who need it to perform their official duties in connection with the intended use of the State-to-State Verification Service and to audit user access to the State-to-State Verification Service.

(F) Participating jurisdictions agree to retain the information for the minimum amount of time necessary, or 14 days, whichever is shorter, and retain only the minimum information that is needed for the sole purposes of this section.

(2) The department shall make
 publicly available on its internet website all contractual agreements with the AAMVA and other documents as necessary with consideration for privacy and security related to the State-to-State Verification Service.

(3) Any material new or modified contract or agreement governing the use, retention, or collection of data, including, but not limited to, the data elements shared with the AAMVA, shall be consistent with the authority provided in this section and any other applicable provision of state law. Prior to execution, the department shall provide at least 30 days advance written notice of any material new or modified contract or agreement subject to this subdivision to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(h) By no later than January 1, 2030, the California State Auditor shall conduct an audit of the
 department’s compliance with this section. In determining the timing of the audit before that date, the California State Auditor shall allow a reasonable period after the program becomes operational to support the initial program implementation and the accumulation of sufficient information for review. This section does not prohibit the auditor from initiating an audit requested by the Legislature through the Joint Legislative Audit Committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 14.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.4.

(a) For all of the following persons, the person’s home address that appears in a record of the department is confidential if the person requests the confidentiality of that information:

(1) Attorney General.

(2) State Public Defender.

(3) A Member of the Legislature.

(4) An active or retired judge or court commissioner.

(5) A district attorney.

(6) A public defender.

(7) An attorney employed by the Department of Justice, the office of the State Public Defender, or a county office of the district attorney or public defender.

(8) A city attorney, city prosecutor, or an attorney who submits verification from their public employer that the attorney represents the city in matters that routinely place the attorney in personal contact with persons under investigation for, charged with, or convicted of, committing criminal acts, if that attorney is employed by a city attorney or city prosecutor.

(9) A nonsworn police dispatcher.

(10) A child abuse investigator or social worker, working in child protective services within a social
 services department.

(11) An active or retired peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(12) An employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Juvenile Facilities, or the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation
 Authority specified in Sections 20403 and 20405 of the Government Code.

(13) A nonsworn employee of a city police department, a county sheriff’s office, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a federal, state, or local detention facility, or a local juvenile hall, camp, ranch, or home, who submits agency verification that, in the normal course of the employee’s employment, the employee controls or supervises inmates or is required to have a prisoner in the employee’s care or custody.

(14) A county counsel assigned to child abuse cases.

(15) An investigator employed by the Department of Justice, a county district attorney, or a county public defender.

(16) A member of a city council.

(17) A member of a board of supervisors.

(18) A federal prosecutor, criminal investigator, or National Park Service Ranger working in this state.

(19) An active or retired city enforcement officer engaged in the enforcement of the Vehicle Code or municipal parking ordinances.

(20) An employee of a trial court.

(21) A psychiatric social worker employed by a county.

(22) A police or sheriff department employee designated by the chief of police of the department or the sheriff of the county as being
 in a sensitive position. A designation pursuant to this paragraph shall, for purposes of this section, remain in effect for three years subject to additional designations that, for purposes of this section, shall remain in effect for additional three-year periods.

(23) A state employee in one of the following classifications:

(A) Licensing-Registration Examiner, Department of Motor Vehicles.

(B) Motor Carrier Specialist I, Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(C) Museum Security Officer and Supervising Museum Security Officer.

(D) Licensing Program Analyst, State Department of Social Services.

(24) (A) The spouse or child of a person listed in paragraphs (1) to (23), inclusive, regardless of the spouse’s or child’s place of residence.

(B) The surviving spouse or child of a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, if the peace officer died in the line of duty.

(C) The surviving spouse or child of a judge or court commissioner, if the judge or court commissioner died in the performance of their duties.

(D) (i) Subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) do not apply if the person listed in those subparagraphs was convicted of a crime and is on active
 parole or probation.

(ii) For requests made on or after January 1, 2011, the person requesting confidentiality for their spouse or child listed in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) shall declare, at the time of the request for confidentiality, whether the spouse or child has been convicted of a crime and is on active parole or probation.

(iii) Neither the listed person’s employer nor the department shall be required to verify, or be responsible for verifying, that a person listed in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) was convicted of a crime and is on active parole or probation.

(E) (i) The department shall discontinue holding a home address confidential pursuant to this subdivision for a person specified in subparagraph
 (A), (B), or (C) who is the child or spouse of a person described in paragraph (4), (9), (11), (13), or (22) if the child or spouse is convicted of a felony in this state or is convicted of an offense in another jurisdiction that, if committed in California, would be a felony.

(ii) The department shall comply with this subparagraph upon receiving notice of a disqualifying conviction from the agency that employs or formerly employed the parent or spouse of the convicted person, or as soon as the department otherwise becomes aware of the disqualifying conviction.

(b) The confidential home address of a person listed in subdivision (a) shall not be disclosed, except to any of the following:

(1) A court.

(2) A law enforcement agency.

(3) The State Board of Equalization.

(4) An attorney in a civil or criminal action that demonstrates to a court the need for the home address, if the disclosure is made pursuant to a subpoena.

(5) A governmental agency to which, under any law, information is required to be furnished from records maintained by the department.

(c) (1) A record of the department containing a confidential home address shall be open to public inspection, as provided in Section 1808, if the address is completely obliterated or otherwise removed from the record.

(2) Following termination of office or employment, a confidential home address shall be withheld from public inspection for three years, unless the termination is the result of conviction of a criminal offense or a request to remove confidentiality protections has been made by an employing agency pursuant to paragraph (6). If the termination or separation is the result of the filing of a criminal complaint, a confidential home address shall be withheld from public inspection during the time in which the terminated individual may file an appeal from termination, while an appeal from termination is ongoing, and until the appeal process is exhausted, after which confidentiality shall be at the discretion of the employing agency if the termination or separation is upheld. Upon reinstatement to an office or employment, the protections of
 this section are available.

(3) With respect to a retired peace officer, the peace officer’s home address shall be withheld from public inspection permanently upon request of confidentiality at the time the information would otherwise be opened. The home address of the surviving spouse or child listed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) shall be withheld from public inspection for three years following the death of the peace officer.

(4) The department shall inform a person who requests a confidential home address what agency the individual whose address was requested is employed by or the court at which the judge or court commissioner presides.

(5) With respect to a retired judge or court commissioner,
 the retired judge or court commissioner’s home address shall be withheld from public inspection permanently upon request of confidentiality at the time the information would otherwise be opened. The home address of the surviving spouse or child listed in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (24) of subdivision (a) shall be withheld from public inspection for three years following the death of the judge or court commissioner.

(6) Following a termination of employment, the terminated individual’s employing agency may request that the department remove the confidentiality protections of this section for the terminated individual if no appeal to the termination is filed or if the termination or separation is upheld. The employing agency shall certify in its request to the department that no appeal to the termination has been filed or that the
 termination or separation has been upheld. If the terminated individual files an appeal from termination, the individual’s confidential home address shall be withheld from public inspection while the appeal from termination is ongoing and until the appeal process is exhausted. The department shall comply with a request made pursuant to this paragraph within 45 days of receipt. This paragraph shall not apply to terminations of employment resulting from the filing of a criminal complaint.

(d) A violation of subdivision (a) by the disclosure of the confidential home address of a peace officer, as specified in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a), a nonsworn employee of the city police department or county sheriff’s office, a judge or court commissioner, as specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), or the spouses or children of these
 persons, including, but not limited to, the surviving spouse or child listed in subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (24) of subdivision (a), that results in bodily injury to the peace officer, employee of the city police department or county sheriff’s office, judge or court commissioner, or the spouses or children of these persons is a felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 71.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.45.

The willful, unauthorized disclosure of information from any department record to any person, or the use of any false representation to obtain information from a department record or any use of information obtained from any department record for a purpose other than the one stated in the request or the sale or other distribution of the information to a person or organization for purposes not disclosed in the request is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year, or both fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1213, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.46.

No person or agent shall directly or indirectly obtain information from the department files using false representations or distribute restricted or confidential information to any person or use the information for a reason not authorized or specified in a requester code application. Any person who violates this section, in addition to any other penalty provided in this code, is liable to the department for civil penalties up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) and shall have its requester code privileges suspended for a period of up to five years, or revoked. The regulatory agencies having jurisdiction over any licensed person receiving information pursuant to this chapter shall implement procedures to review the procedures of any licensee which receives information to ensure compliance with the limitations on the use of information as part of the agency’s regular oversight of the licensees. The agency shall report noncompliance to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1635, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.47.
